Maryland, session 2025, HB0615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.
(d) (1) The budget shall be adopted at an open meeting of the council of unit
owners or any other body to which the council of unit owners delegates responsibilities for
preparing and adopting the budget.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0615*

HOUSE BILL 615
(2) (i) The council of unit owners or other governing body of unit owners
shall submit the adopted annual budget to the unit owners not more than 30 days after the
meeting at which the budget was adopted.
(ii) The adopted annual budget may be submitted to each unit owner
by electronic transmission, by posting on the condominium association’s home page, or by
inclusion in the [homeowners] CONDOMINIUM association’s newsletter.
11B–111.5.
(a) If a homeowners association fails to fill vacancies on the governing body
sufficient to constitute a quorum in accordance with the bylaws, three or more owners of
lots may petition the circuit court for the county where the [condominium] HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION is located to appoint a receiver to manage the affairs of the homeowners
association.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.